New Jersey, session 221, S2292.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 19 of P.L.1983, c.362 (C.17:28-1.3) is amended to read as follows: 19.  a.  Every liability insurance policy issued in this State on a motor vehicle, exclusive of an automobile as defined in section 2 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-2), but including a motorcycle and an autocycle, or on a motorized bicycle, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed electric scooter, insuring against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death, and property damage sustained by any person arising out of the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, low-speed electric bicycle, low-speed electric scooter, or motorized bicycle shall provide personal injury protection coverage benefits, in accordance with section 4 of P.L. 1972, c. 70 (C.39:6A-4), to pedestrians who sustain bodily injury in the State caused by the named insured's motor vehicle, low-speed electric bicycle, low-speed electric scooter, or motorized bicycle or by being struck by an object propelled by or from the motor vehicle, low-speed electric bicycle, low-speed electric scooter, or motorized bicycle. b.    For purposes of this section: "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals in which the operator and passenger may ride in a completely or partially enclosed seating area that is equipped with a roll cage or roll hoops, safety seat belts for each occupant, and anti-lock brakes. "Low-speed electric bicycle" means a two or three-wheeled vehicle with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than 750 watts, that meets the requirements of one of the following classifications: "class 1 low-speed electric bicycle" which means a low-speed electric bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling, and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour; or "class 2 low-speed electric bicycle'' which means a low-speed electric bicycle equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle, and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour. "Low-speed electric scooter" means a scooter with a floorboard that can be stood upon by the operator, with handlebars, and an electric motor that is capable of propelling the device with or without human propulsion at a maximum speed of less than 19 miles per hour. "Motorcycle" includes motorcycles, autocycles, motor bikes, bicycles with motor attached and all motor-operated vehicles of the bicycle or tricycle type, except motorized bicycles as defined in this section, whether the motive power be a part thereof or attached thereto and having a saddle or seat with the driver sitting astride or upon it or a platform on which the driver stands. "Motorized bicycle" means a pedal bicycle having a helper motor characterized in that either the maximum piston displacement is less than 50 cc. or said motor is rated at no more than 1.5 brake horsepower or is powered by an electric drive motor and said bicycle is capable of a maximum speed of no more than 25 miles per hour on a flat surface. (cf: P.L.2019, c.110, s.2.) 2.    Section 14 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-14) is amended to read as follows: 14.  Every owner or registrant of an automobile, low-speed electric bicycle, low-speed electric scooter, or autocycle registered or principally garaged in this State shall maintain uninsured motorist coverage as provided in P.L.1968, c.385 (C.17:28-1.1). (cf: P.L.2016, c.35, s.6.) 3.    Section 2 of P.L.2019, c.121 (C.39:4-14.16) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  A low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, as defined in R.S.39:1-1, may be operated on the streets, highways, roadways, and bicycle paths of this State, except as otherwise provided in this section, and may be parked on a sidewalk provided that the low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter does not impede the normal movement of pedestrian or other traffic upon the sidewalk. b.    On and after January 1, 2019, manufacturers and distributors of low-speed electric bicycles shall apply a label that is permanently affixed, in a prominent location, to each low-speed electric bicycle. The label shall contain the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the low-speed electric bicycle, and shall be printed in Arial font in at least 9-point type. c.     A person shall not tamper with or modify a low-speed electric bicycle so as to change the motor-powered speed capability or engagement of a low-speed electric bicycle, unless that person appropriately replaces the label indicating the classification required in subsection b. of this section. d.    A low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter may be operated on bicycle paths, except that a local government entity or State agency may prohibit the operation of low-speed electric bicycles or low-speed electric scooters on bicycle paths under its jurisdiction. e.     Unless permitted by a local government entity or State agency with jurisdiction, a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter shall not be operated on a trail designated for non-motorized traffic if such trail has a natural surface tread made by clearing and grading the soil and no surfacing materials have been added. f.     The operator of a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter shall not be required to [register the low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, and furnish proof of insurance, or] have a driver's license. g.    Except as otherwise provided by this section, all statutes, including the provisions of chapter 4 of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes, rules, and regulations applicable to bicycles, as defined in section 1 of P.L.1991, c.465 (C.39:4-10.1), shall apply to low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed electric scooters, except those provisions which by their very nature may have no application to low-speed electric bicycles or low-speed electric scooters. h.    A low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter shall be considered a motor vehicle to the extent required by 23 U.S.C. s.154. i.     (1)  No person shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter unless the low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter is registered by the owner thereof, as provided in this subsection. (2)   The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission is authorized to grant a registration certificate to the owner of a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, provided that the application for registration has been properly submitted, the registration fee has been paid, and the low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter is of a type approved by the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. (3)   The form and contents of the registration certificate shall be prescribed by the chief administrator.  The chief administrator shall maintain a record of all registration certificates issued and their contents. (4)   The registration shall expire and the registration certificate shall become void on the last day of the 11th calendar month following the calendar month in which the certificate was issued, except that the chief administrator may suspend or revoke a registration for any violation of this section or any rules promulgated thereunder. (5)   Application forms for all renewals of registrations for low-speed electric bicycles and low-speed electric scooters shall be mailed by the commission to the last known address of the owner of the low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, as such address appears on the records of the commission. (6)   The fee for the initial registration of a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter, and each renewal of registration, shall be $8. j.     An owner or registered owner of a low-speed electric bicycle or low-speed electric scooter registered or principally garaged in this State shall maintain liability insurance coverage pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1972, c.197 (C.39:6B-1), personal injury protection coverage for pedestrians pursuant to section 19 of P.L. 1983, c.362 (C.17:28-1.3), and uninsured motorist coverage pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-14). (cf: P.L.2019, c.121, s.2) 4.    Section 1 of P.L.1972, c.197 (C.39:6B-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Every owner or registered owner of a motor vehicle, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed electric scooter registered or principally garaged in this State shall maintain motor vehicle, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed electric scooter liability insurance coverage, under provisions approved by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, insuring against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death and property damage sustained by any person arising out of the ownership, maintenance, operation or use of a motor vehicle, low-speed electric bicycle, or low-speed electric scooter wherein such coverage shall be at least in: (1) an amount or limit of $15,000 for plans issued or renewed prior to January 1, 2023, $25,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023 but prior to January 1, 2026, and $35,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, exclusive of interest and costs, on account of injury to, or death of, one person, in any one accident; and (2) an amount or limit, subject to such limit for any one person so injured or killed, of $30,000 for plans issued or renewed prior to January 1, 2023, $50,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023 but prior to January 1, 2026, and $70,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, exclusive of interest and costs, on account of injury to or death of, more than one person, in any one accident; and (3) an amount or limit of $25,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023, exclusive of interest and costs, for damage to property in any one accident. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, an owner or registered owner of an automobile, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-2), registered or primarily garaged in the State may satisfy the requirements of subsection a. of this section by maintaining a basic automobile insurance policy containing coverages provided pursuant to subsections a. and b. of section 4 of P.L.1998, c.21 (C.39:6A-3.1). c.     Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, an owner or registered owner of an automobile, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-2), registered or primarily garaged in the State may satisfy the requirements of subsection a. of this section by maintaining a special automobile insurance policy containing coverages provided pursuant to subsection b. of section 45 of P.L.2003, c.89 (C.39:6A-3.3). d.    Upon the renewal of a policy of insurance that, under its original policy limits, would no longer meet the minimum requirements established pursuant to this section, an insurer shall notify the named insured that the policy limits have been increased to meet the requirements established pursuant to this section.  Notice provided pursuant to this subsection shall specify the limit or limits that have been increased to meet the requirements established pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an insurer shall not be required to receive a signed coverage selection form pursuant to N.J.A.C.11:3-15.7, to increase a policy's limits pursuant to this section. (cf: P.L.2022, c.87, s.2.) 5. This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.